lt-LT: Lipnaus kabliukų ir kilpelių užsegimo forma: Kabelių dirželiai / raiščiai; Apskritimai; Iškirstos / pasirinktinės formos; Taškeliai; Vieno apsukimo (dvipusė) juostelė; Ovalai; Stačiakampiai; Ritinys / juosta; Kvadratai; Juostelės; Kita
nl: Vorm van zelfklevende klittenbandsluiting: Kabelbinders/bandjes; Cirkels; Gestanst/aangepaste vormen; Stippen; One-wrap (dubbelzijdige) strip; Ovalen; Rechthoeken; Rol/tape; Vierkanten; Strips; Overig
el: Σχήμα αυτοκόλλητου συνδετήρα hook & loop: Δεματικά καλωδίων/ιμάντες; Κύκλοι; Κομμένα/προσαρμοσμένα σχήματα; Βούλες; Ταινία μονής περιέλιξης (διπλής όψης); Οβάλ; Ορθογώνια; Ρολό/ταινία; Τετράγωνα; Λωρίδες; Άλλο
es: Forma del cierre de velcro autoadhesivo: Bridas/correas para cables; Círculos; Formas personalizadas/troqueladas; Puntos; Tira de una vuelta (doble cara); Óvalos; Rectángulos; Rollo/cinta; Cuadrados; Tiras; Otra
sl-SI: Oblika samolepilne sponke na ježka: Kabelske vezice/trakovi; Krogi; Izsekane/oblike po meri; Pike; Obojestranski trak One-wrap; Ovali; Pravokotniki; Rola/trak; Kvadratki; Trakovi; Drugo
ko: 점착식 찍찍이 테이프 모양: 케이블 타이/스트랩; 원형; 다이 컷/맞춤형 모양; 도트형; 원랩(양면) 스트립; 타원형; 직사각형; 롤/테이프; 정사각형; 스트립형; 기타
zh-CN: 自粘钩扣形式: 扎带/绑带; 圆形; 模切/定制形状; 圆点; 背靠背（双面）绑带; 椭圆形; 长方形; 卷状/带状; 正方形; 条状; 其他
ja: 自己粘着面ファスナー形状: ケーブルタイ/ストラップ; 円形; ダイカット/カスタム形状; ドット; ワンラップ (両面) ストリップ; 楕円形; 長方形; ロール/テープ; 正方形; ストリップ; その他
th: รูปทรงของตัวยึดแบบตีนตุ๊กแกที่มีกาวในตัว: เคเบิลไทร์/สายรัด; วงกลม; ไดคัท/รูปทรงที่กำหนดเอง; จุด; แถบพันรัด (สองด้าน); วงรี; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ม้วน/เทป; สี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; แถบ; อื่นๆ
vi: Hình dáng của miếng băng gai dính tự dính: Dây thít/dây đai; Hình tròn; Hình dạng bế/tùy chỉnh; Dấu chấm; Dải quấn một vòng (hai mặt); Hình bầu dục; Hình chữ nhật; Cuộn/băng; Hình vuông; Dải; Khác
de: Form des selbstklebenden Klettverschlusses: Kabelbinder/Gurte; Kreise; Gestanzt/Sonderformen; Punkte; Doppelseitiges Band (One-Wrap); Ovale; Rechtecke; Rolle/Band; Quadrate; Streifen; Andere
pl: Kształt samoprzylepnego rzepa: Opaski kablowe/paski; Koła; Wykrawane / niestandardowe kształty; Kropki; Taśma owijana (dwustronna); Owale; Prostokąty; Rolka/taśma; Kwadraty; Paski; Inne
it: Shape del dispositivo di fissaggio autoadesivo con gancio e cappio: Fascette/Cinturini per cavi; Cerchi; Fustellato/Forme personalizzate; Punti; Striscia one-wrap (bifacciale); Ovali; Rettangoli; Rotolo/Nastro; Quadrati; Strisce; Altro
hu: Öntapadós tépőzár alakja: Kábelkötegelők / Hevederek; Körök; Stancolt / Egyedi formák; Pöttyök; Kétoldalas pánt; Oválisok; Téglalapok; Tekercs / Szalag; Négyzetek; Csíkok; Egyéb
nb: Form på selvklebende feste for glidelås: Buntebånd/stropper; Sirkler; Utstanset/tilpassede former; Prikker; Dobbeltsidig stropp; Ovaler; Rektangler; Rull/tape; Kvadratiske; Strimler; Annet
ro-RO: Formă a prinderii autoadezive cu velcro: Coliere/curele pentru cabluri; Cercuri; Forme ștanțate/personalizate; Puncte; Bandă cu înfășurare (cu două fețe); Ovale; Dreptunghiuri; Rolă/bandă; Pătrate; Benzi; Altele
zh-TW: 自黏魔鬼氈形狀: 束線帶/綁帶; 圓形; 模切/客製化形狀; 圓點; 雙面成卷綁帶條; 橢圓形; 長方形; 捲/膠帶; 正方形; 條狀; 其他
cs: Tvar samolepicího suchého zipu: Stahovací pásky / popruhy na kabely; Kruhy; Vysekávané/vlastní tvary; Tečky; Oboustranný upevňovací pásek (One-wrap); Ovály; Obdélníky; Role/páska; Čtverce; Proužky; Jiné
en: Self-adhesive hook & loop fastener shape: Cable ties/straps; Circles; Die-cut/custom shapes; Dots; One-wrap (double-sided) strip; Ovals; Rectangles; Roll/tape; Squares; Strips; Other
fr: Forme de fermeture auto-adhésive à boucles et crochets: Serre-câbles/sangles; Cercles; Formes découpées/sur mesure; Pastilles; Bande auto-agrippante (double face); Ovales; Rectangles; Rouleau/ruban; Carrés; Bandes; Autre
bg-BG: Форма на самозалепващо велкро: Кабелни превръзки/ленти; Кръгове; Изрязани/персонализирани форми; Точки; Двустранна залепваща лента; Овали; Правоъгълници; Ролка/лента; Квадрати; Ленти; Друго
da: Form på selvklæbende burrebåndslukning: Kabelbindere/stropper; Cirkler; Udstansede/specialtilpassede former; Prikker; One-wrap (dobbeltsidet) bånd; Ovaler; Rektangler; Rulle/tape; Firkanter; Strimler; Andet
ru: Форма самоклеящейся текстильной застежки: Кабельные стяжки/ремешки; Круги; Вырубные/произвольные формы; Точки; Двусторонняя лента-липучка (One-Wrap); Овалы; Прямоугольники; Рулон/лента; Квадраты; Полосы; Другое
sk-SK: Tvar samolepiaceho háčika a pásky: Sťahovacie pásky/remienky; Kruhy; Vyrezávané/vlastné tvary; Bodky; Obojstranný pásik (One-Wrap); Ovály; Obdĺžniky; Rolka/páska; Štvorce; Pásiky; Iné
fi: Itsestään kiinnittyvien tarranauhojen muoto: Nippusiteet/hihnat; Ympyrät; Muotoon leikatut / mukautetut muodot; Täplät; Kaksipuolinen tarranauha; Ovaalit; Suorakulmiot; Rulla/teippi; Neliöt; Liuskat; Muu
pt-BR: Formato do fecho de contato autoadesivo: Abraçadeiras/tiras para cabos; Círculos; Formatos recortados/personalizados; Pontos; Tira de uma volta (dupla face); Ovais; Retângulos; Rolo/fita; Quadrados; Tiras; Outros
pt-PT: Formato do fecho autoadesivo de gancho e laço: Braçadeiras/tiras; Círculos; Recortes/formas personalizadas; Pontos; Fita envolvente (dupla face); Ovais; Retângulos; Rolo/fita; Quadrados; Tiras; Outro
hr-HR: Oblik samoljepljivog čičak-zatvarača.: Kabelske vezice/trake; Krugovi; Izrezano / prilagođeni oblici; Točkice; Obavijajuća (dvostrana) traka; Ovali; Pravokutnici; Rola/traka; Kvadrati; Trake; Ostalo
sv: Form på kardborreband: Buntband/remmar; Cirklar; Stansade/anpassade former; Prickar; One-wrap (dubbelhäftande) remsa; Ovaler; Rektanglar; Rulle/tejp; Fyrkanter; Remsor; Övrigt
tr: Kendinden yapışkanlı kancalı ve ilikli kopça şekli: Kablo bağları/kayışları; Daireler; Özel kesim/özel şekiller; Noktalar; Tek sarımlı (çift taraflı) şerit; Ovaller; Dikdörtgenler; Rulo/bant; Kareler; Şeritler; Diğer